Hawaii, session 2026, HB1701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 130, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016 (Act 130), established a statewide framework for transit-oriented development planning.  Act 130 recognized the opportunity to improve quality of life by applying smart growth principles to revitalize neighborhoods, increase affordable housing, and coordinate redevelopment efforts and established procedures for transit-oriented development planning within county-designated zones or within a half-mile radius of public transit stations. The legislature further finds that in 2020, the Honolulu city council unanimously adopted Bill No. 2, C.D. 1, F.D. 2, eliminating off-street parking requirements in certain areas of the primary urban center and Ewa development plan areas, as well as within a half mile of rail transit stations.  According to the department of planning and permitting of the city and county of Honolulu, this change reflected a modern vision to reduce traffic fatalities, curb congestion, and lessen environmental impacts.  The policy aimed to promote alternative transportation, improve design, support the city and county's vision zero goals, and encourage rail ridership. The legislature also finds that Act 184, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, established the transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement district, which was later revamped and changed to the transit-oriented development improvement program under Act 252, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025.  These measures acknowledged the severity of Hawaii's housing crisis and the potential of transit-oriented development to increase housing supply and optimize land use by concentrating higher-density development near transit hubs. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to continue the foundation laid by these Acts, encourage higher-density, transit-supportive development, and remove barriers to affordable housing statewide by prohibiting minimum off-street parking requirements in transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement program areas. SECTION 2.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46-     Off-street parking requirements; prohibited.  (a)  Notwithstanding any other law, charter provision, ordinance, code, or standard to the contrary, minimum off-street parking requirements shall be prohibited for any new development or redevelopment project located within a transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement program area established pursuant to section 206E-243. (b)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to: (1)  Preclude or limit requirements for the provision of accessible parking stalls for persons with disabilities as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, the federal Fair Housing Act, or any other applicable law; (2)  Preclude any developer or property owner from providing off-street parking at their discretion; or (3)  Restrict a county's authority to adopt maximum parking requirements or other policies managing the maximum amount of parking in transit-oriented development infrastructure improvement program areas established pursuant to section 206E-243." SECTION 3.  Section 46-4.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) Notwithstanding any law, ordinance, or code or standard to the contrary, each adaptive reuse ordinance shall: (1)  Allow for the construction of micro units; provided that no county shall require a micro unit to be larger than minimum standards established in the International Building Code; (2)  Allow for adaptive reuse to meet the interior environment requirements of the International Building Code; and (3)  Provide for an exemption to any requirements regarding park dedication or additional off-street parking[;], except as prohibited by section 46-   ; provided that: (A)  The existing off-street parking satisfies at least fifty per cent of a county's parking requirements; and (B)  The building's floor area, height, and setbacks do not change as a result of adaptive reuse; provided further that this paragraph shall not preclude a county from exempting a project under this section from all off-street parking requirements." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2027. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________